Hawaii, session 2026, HB2177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that county parks are inadequately maintained.  Access to recreational facilities are vital to community well-being.  Currently, the City and County of Honolulu has undergone two years of park maintenance standard evaluations, yet staffing and funding constraints have inhibited its ability to implement its results.  The purpose of this Act is to establish park maintenance standard prioritization in order to address on-going noncompliance. SECTION 2.  Chapter 46 Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46    Park Maintenance Standard Prioritization. (a)  A county with a population of five hundred thousand or more shall adopt ordinances to effectuate the following: (1)  Increase frequency of park inspections; (2)  Prioritize improvements for parks that are out of compliance based on county evaluation standards; and (3)  Allocate appropriate staffing and funding to address park incompliance. (b)  In determining which parks to prioritize, each county shall consider the following: (1)  Availability of already compliant parks in each county council district; (2)  The frequency of utilization of each park; (3)  The use of facilities for sporting events; and (4)  Safety concerns regarding lighting and fencing. (c) If the county fails to bring the park into compliance within three months of identification of incompliance, there shall be a fine of $1,000 per park to be deposited into the general funds. (d) The department of land and natural resources may intervene to conduct park maintenance and improvements when the county has failed to do so in a reasonable time.  In the event that the state has incurred costs for county park maintenance and improvements, the county shall be charged to reimburse the state for all expenses incurred. (e)  Each county shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $            or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the city and county of Honolulu for park maintenance standard prioritization. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of parks and recreation of city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________